Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202283-137
State institutions; adjacent highways; improvement.

Upon written request being filed with the Department of Transportation by the chief executive officer of any state institution, located more than one-half mile and not exceeding three miles from a railroad unloading track or permanent highway leading to a railroad unloading track, requesting aid for the improvement of a highway connecting the institution with the permanent highway or railroad unloading track, the department shall make a careful estimate of the cost of improving the highway, and the amount of the special benefits to abutting property, together with the excess of the cost of the improvement above the benefits. If the local authorities in charge of the highway shall adequately provide for the payment of the special benefits and one-half of the excess of the cost of the improvement, the department shall pay the remaining one-half of the excess from funds appropriated for that purpose.

Laws 1919, c. 215, § 2, p. 927;

C.S.1922, § 6862;

C.S.1929, § 83-133;

R.S.1943, § 83-137;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 294.

Procedure for acquiring institutional land for county roads and state highways, see sections 39-1323 and 39-1703.